ja: 商品アドオン: 延長保証; 設置サービス; メンテナンスプラン; 商品のカスタマイズ; 商品のアップグレード; 配送保険; サブスクリプションサービス
ru: Дополнительные услуги для продукта: Расширенная гарантия; Услуги по установке; Планы технического обслуживания; Адаптация продукта под индивидуальные нужды; Обновление продукта; Страхование груза; Абонентское обслуживание
en: Product Add-Ons: Extended Warranties; Installation Services; Maintenance Plans; Product Customization; Product Upgrades; Shipping Insurance; Subscription Services
fi: Tuotteen lisäosat: Laajennetut takuut; Asennuspalvelut; Huolto-ohjelmat; Tuotteen muokattavuus; Tuotepäivitykset; Toimitusvakuutus; Tilauspalvelut
bg-BG: Добавки за продукти: Удължени гаранции; Инсталационни услуги; Планове за поддръжка; Персонализиране на продукта; Продуктови надстройки; Транспортна застраховка; Абонаментни услуги
sk-SK: Doplnky k produktu: Predĺžené záruky; Inštalačné služby; Plány údržby; Prispôsobenie produktu; Inovácie produktu; Poistenie prepravy; Predplatné služby
sl-SI: Dodatki za izdelke: Podaljšane garancije; Storitve namestitve; Vzdrževalni načrti; Prilagajanje izdelka; Nadgradnje izdelka; Zavarovanje pošiljke; Naročniške storitve
hu: Termékkiegészítők: Kiterjesztett garanciák; Telepítési szolgáltatások; Karbantartási tervek; Terméktestreszabás; Termékfrissítések; Szállítási biztosítás; Előfizetéses szolgáltatások
vi: Tiện ích sản phẩm: Bảo hành mở rộng; Dịch vụ lắp đặt; Kế hoạch bảo trì; Tùy chỉnh sản phẩm; Nâng cấp sản phẩm; Bảo hiểm vận chuyển; Dịch vụ đăng ký
th: ส่วนเสริมผลิตภัณฑ์: การขยายการรับประกัน; บริการติดตั้ง; แผนการบำรุงรักษา; การปรับเปลี่ยนผลิตภัณฑ์; การอัปเกรดผลิตภัณฑ์; ประกันการขนส่ง; บริการการสมัครใช้งาน
ro-RO: Add-on-uri produse: Garanții prelungite; Servicii de instalare; Planuri de întreținere; Personalizare produse; Upgrade-uri produse; Asigurare de transport; Servicii pe bază de abonament
nb: Tillegg til produkter: Utvidede garantier; Installasjonstjenester; Vedlikeholdsprogrammer; Tilpasning av produkter; Produktoppgraderinger; Fraktforsikring; Abonnementstjenester
zh-CN: 产品附加件: 延长保修; 安装服务; 维护计划; 产品定制; 产品升级; 运输保险; 订阅服务
pl: Dodatki do produktów: Rozszerzone gwarancje; Usługi instalacyjne; Plany konserwacji; Dostosowanie produktu; Uaktualnienia produktu; Ubezpieczenie przesyłki; Usługi subskrypcyjne
es: Complementos de productos: Garantías ampliadas; Servicios de instalación; Planes de mantenimiento; Personalización de productos; Mejoras de productos; Seguro de envío; Servicios de suscripción
zh-TW: 商品附加元件: 延長保固期; 安裝服務; 維護方案; 商品客製化; 商品升級; 運送保險; 訂閱服務
de: Produkt-Add-Ons: Erweiterte Garantien; Installationsservices; Wartungssets; Etikettenpersonalisierung; Produkt-Upgrades; Transportversicherung; Abonnementdienste
sv: Produkttillägg: Utökade garantier; Installationstjänster; Underhållskit; Produktanpassning; Produktuppgraderingar; Fraktförsäkring; Prenumerationstjänster
pt-BR: Complementos de produtos: Garantias estendidas; Serviços de instalação; Planos de manutenção; Personalização de produto; Upgrades de produtos; Seguro de frete; Serviços de assinatura
hr-HR: Dodatni proizvodi: Produljena jamstva; Usluge instaliranja; Planovi održavanja; Prilagodba proizvoda; Nadogradnje proizvoda; Osiguranje otpreme; Usluge pretplate
el: Πρόσθετα προϊόντων: Επεκτάσεις εγγύησης; Υπηρεσίες εγκατάστασης; Σχέδια συντήρησης; Εξατομίκευση προϊόντων; Αναβαθμίσεις προϊόντων; Ασφάλιση αποστολής; Συνδρομητικές υπηρεσίες
tr: Ürün Eklentileri: Uzatılmış Garantiler; Kurulum Hizmetleri; Bakım planları; Ürün özelleştirme; Ürün Geliştirmeleri; Nakliye sigortası; Abonelik Hizmetleri
it: Componenti aggiuntivi del prodotto: Garanzie estese; Servizi di installazione; Piani di manutenzione; Personalizzazione del prodotto; Aggiornamenti del prodotto; Assicurazione sulla spedizione; Servizi in abbonamento
fr: Modules complémentaires du produit: Garanties prolongées; Services d’installation; Plans d’entretien; Personnalisation de produit; Mises à niveau du produit; Assurance expédition; Services d’abonnement
pt-PT: Complementos de produtos: Garantias prolongadas; Serviços de instalação; Planos de manutenção; Personalização do produto; Atualizações de produtos; Seguro de envio; Serviços de assinatura
nl: Product toevoegingen: Verlengde garantie; Installatiediensten; Onderhoudsplannen; Productaanpassing; Productupgrades; Verzendverzekering; Abonnementsdiensten
cs: Doplňky produktů: Prodloužené záruky; Instalační služby; Plány údržby; Přizpůsobení produktu; Upgrady produktu; Pojištění zásilky; Předplatné služby
ko: 제품 추가 기능: 보증 연장; 설치 서비스; 유지보수 계획; 제품 맞춤화; 제품 업그레이드; 운송 보험; 구독 서비스
lt-LT: Gaminių priedai: Pratęstos garantijos; Montavimo paslaugos; Priežiūros planai; Gaminių pritaikymas; Gaminių atnaujinimai; Siuntimo draudimas; Prenumeratos paslaugos
da: Produkttilføjelser: Udvidede garantier; Installationstjenester; Vedligeholdelsesplaner; Produkttilpasning; Produktopgraderinger; Leveringsforsikring; Abonnementstjenester